Tennessee, session 114, SB0703.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall conduct a study and prepare a report on recommendations for establishing
sustainable funding sources that meet this state's future transportation infrastructure
needs.
(b) The study and report must:
(1) Examine overall road, bridge, and other transportation infrastructure
needs of this state;
(2) Identify measures to increase revenue to meet the transportation
infrastructure needs of this state in the long-term future;
SB0703
002684
- 1 -

(3) Identify alternative sources to current motor fuel-based taxes and
vehicle registration fees to supplement the decreases in transportation
infrastructure funding due to vehicles becoming more fuel efficient or using no
fuel; and
(4) Survey funding sources and programs used by at least three (3) other
states to address their challenges in establishing sustainable transportation
infrastructure funding.
(c) All appropriate state departments and agencies shall provide assistance to
TACIR in connection with the study required by subsection (a).
(d) On or before January 15, 2026, TACIR shall report its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the chair of the committee of
the house of representatives having jurisdiction over transportation matters, the chair of
the transportation and safety committee of the senate, and the legislative librarian.
(e) It is the legislative intent that this study must be conducted from TACIR's
existing resources.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002684